Maryland, session 2025, HB0789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–206.
(A) THERE IS A MINIMUM ADEQUATE SECURITY STANDARD FOR
COURTROOM SECURITY AT ALL COURTHOUSE FACILITIES IN THE STATE.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A COURT SECURITY OFFICER MUST
MEET THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR A SPECIAL POLICE OFFICER, AS DEFINED IN §
3–301 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THERE SHALL BE PRESENT IN EVERY
COURTROOM DURING PROCEEDINGS AT LEAST:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0789*

HOUSE BILL 789
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR ANY CRIMINAL, FAMILY, OR
JUVENILE PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS FOR ANY PROCEEDING
INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE
REMANDED TO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, THERE SHALL BE PRESENT IN EVERY
COURTROOM DURING PROCEEDINGS AT LEAST:
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR ANY PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS FOR ANY PROCEEDING
INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE
REMANDED TO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 30,
2025, each law enforcement agency, department, or entity providing security at a
courthouse facility shall submit a report to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of
Maryland and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly identifying:
(1) the current number of court security officers available to provide
courthouse security;
(2) the minimum number of court security officers necessary to meet the
minimum adequate security standards, accounting for annual leave and absences;
(3) the current number of courthouse security positions for which funding
has been allocated;
(4) the current number of vacancies in the agency, department, or entity;
(5) a viable plan to meet the minimum adequate security standards under
Section 1 of this Act; and
(6) any obstacles to the agency, department, or entity meeting those
minimum adequate security standards.

HOUSE BILL 789 3
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.